Nevada, session 83, SB218.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 52 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 4 to 11,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 4. “Additional documentary material” means the
additional documentary material filed with a Hart-Scott-Rodino
form.
Sec. 5. “Electronic” means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or
similar capabilities.
Sec. 6. “Filing threshold” means the minimum size of a
transaction that requires the transaction to be reported under the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act in effect when a person files a pre-merger
notification.
Sec. 7. “Hart-Scott-Rodino Act” means section 201 of the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, 15 U.S.C.
§ 18a, as amended.
-
*SB218_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 8. “Hart-Scott-Rodino form” means the form filed with
a pre-merger notification, excluding additional documentary
material.
Sec. 9. “Person” means an individual, estate, business or
nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency
or instrumentality or other legal entity.
Sec. 10. “Pre-merger notification” means a notification filed
under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act with the Federal Trade
Commission or the United States Department of Justice Antitrust
Division, or a successor agency.
Sec. 11. “State” means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands or any other territory or possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States.
Sec. 12. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a
person filing a pre-merger notification shall file
contemporaneously a complete electronic copy of the Hart-Scott-
Rodino form with the Attorney General if:
(a) The person has its principal place of business in this State;
or
(b) The person or a person it controls directly or indirectly had
annual net sales in this State of the goods or services involved in
the transaction of at least 20 percent of the filing threshold.
2. A person that files a form under paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 shall include with the filing a complete electronic
copy of the additional documentary material.
3. On request of the Attorney General, a person that filed a
form under paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall provide a complete
electronic copy of the additional documentary material to the
Attorney General not later than 7 days after receipt of the request.
4. The Attorney General may not charge a fee connected with
filing or providing the form or additional documentary material
under this section.
5. The provisions of this section do not apply to a licensee or
an affiliate of a licensee. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Affiliate” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 463.0133.
(b) “Licensee” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 463.0171.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
section 14 of this act, the Attorney General may not make public
or disclose:
(a) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form filed under section 12 of this
act;
(b) The additional documentary material filed or provided
under section 12 of this act;
-
*SB218_R1*

– 4 –
(c) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form or additional documentary
material provided by the attorney general of another state;
(d) That the form or the additional documentary material were
filed or provided under section 12 of this act or provided by the
attorney general of another state; or
(e) The merger proposed in the form.
2. A form, additional documentary material and other
information listed in subsection 1 are exempt from disclosure
under chapter 239 of NRS.
3. Subject to a protective order entered by an agency, court or
judicial officer, the Attorney General may disclose a form,
additional documentary material or other information listed in
subsection 1 in an administrative proceeding or judicial action if
the proposed merger is relevant to the proceeding or action.
4. This chapter does not:
(a) Limit any other confidentiality or information-security
obligation of the Attorney General;
(b) Preclude the Attorney General from sharing information
with the Federal Trade Commission or the United States
Department of Justice Antitrust Division, or a successor agency;
or
(c) Preclude the Attorney General from sharing information
with the attorney general of another state that has enacted the
Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act or a substantively
equivalent act. The other state’s act must include confidentiality
provisions at least as protective as the confidentiality provisions of
the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act.
Sec. 14. 1. The Attorney General may disclose a Hart-
Scott-Rodino form and additional documentary material filed or
provided under section 12 of this act to the attorney general of
another state that enacts the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger
Notification Act or a substantively equivalent act. The other state’s
act must include confidentiality provisions at least as protective as
the confidentiality provisions of the Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger
Notification Act.
2. At least 2 business days before making a disclosure under
subsection 1, the Attorney General shall give notice of the
disclosure to the person filing or providing the form or additional
documentary material under section 12 of this act.
Sec. 15. The Attorney General may seek imposition of a civil
penalty of not more than $10,000 per day of noncompliance on a
person that fails to comply with subsection 1, 2 or 3 of section 12
of this act. A civil penalty imposed under this section is subject to
procedural requirements applicable to the Attorney General,
including the requirements of due process.
-
*SB218_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 16. In applying and construing the provisions of this
chapter, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the
law among jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Antitrust Pre-
Merger Notification Act.
Sec. 17. NRS 598A.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.390 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
any person conducting business in this State who is a party to a
reportable health care or health carrier transaction shall, at least 30
days before the consummation of the reportable health care or health
carrier transaction, submit to the Attorney General a notification on
a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The notification must
contain the following information, to the extent such information is
applicable:
(a) A brief description of the nature of the proposed relationship
among the parties to the proposed reportable health care or health
carrier transaction;
(b) The names and specialties of each practitioner working for
the group practice that is the subject of the reportable health care or
health carrier transaction and who is anticipated to work with the
resulting group practice following the effective date of the
transaction;
(c) The names of the business entities that are anticipated to
provide health care services or health carrier services following the
effective date of the reportable health care or health carrier
transaction;
(d) An identification of each anticipated location where health
care services or health carrier services are to be provided following
the effective date of the reportable health care or health carrier
transaction;
(e) A description of the services to be provided by practitioners
at each location identified pursuant to paragraph (d); and
(f) The primary service area to be served by each location
identified pursuant to paragraph (d).
2. If a person who is a party to a reportable health care or
health carrier transaction is required to:
(a) Submit a copy of a filing to the Attorney General pursuant to
NRS 598A.400 regarding the transaction, the copy of the filing
submitted pursuant to NRS 598A.400 satisfies the requirement for
notification pursuant to subsection 1.
(b) Submit a notification to the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 692C.363 regarding the transaction, the person
may satisfy the requirement for notification pursuant to subsection 1
by simultaneously submitting to the Attorney General a copy of the
notification submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance.
-
*SB218_R1*

– 6 –
(c) File a copy of a filing with the Attorney General pursuant
to section 12 of this act regarding the transaction, the copy of the
filing filed pursuant to section 12 of this act satisfies the
requirement for submitting a notification pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 18. NRS 598A.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.400 1. Any person conducting business in this State
that files a notification with the Federal Trade Commission or the
United States Department of Justice pursuant to the Hart-Scott-
Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, 15 U.S.C. § 18a
regarding a transaction that involves any assets of a group practice
or health carrier in this State and who is not otherwise required to
file a copy of the notification with the Attorney General pursuant
to section 12 of this act shall simultaneously submit a copy of the
filing to the Attorney General.
2. A person that submits a copy of a filing to the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 1 satisfies the requirement for notice
set forth in NRS 598A.390.
Sec. 19. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
-
*SB218_R1*

– 7 –
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
-
*SB218_R1*

– 8 –
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, section 13 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
-
*SB218_R1*

– 9 –
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 20. 1. The provisions of this act apply only to a pre-
merger notification filed on or after October 1, 2025.
2. As used in this section, “pre-merger notification” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 10 of this act.
H
-
*SB218_R1*